prince/dictionaries/lt.aff
SFX V Y 46
SFX V is      iui             [^dt]is   
SFX V tis     čiui            tis       
SFX V dis     džiui           dis       
SFX V is      ies             is        
SFX V is      į               is        
SFX V is      imi             is        
SFX V is      yje             is        
SFX V is      y               is        
SFX V is      ie              is        
SFX V is      ys              is        
SFX V is      ims             is        
SFX V is      imis            is        
SFX V is      yse             is        
SFX V uo      ens             [^š]uo    
SFX V uo      eniui           [^š]uo    
SFX V uo      enį             [^š]uo    
SFX V uo      eniu            [^š]uo    
SFX V uo      enimi           [^š]uo    
SFX V uo      enyje           [^š]uo    
SFX V uo      eny             [^š]uo    
SFX V uo      enie            [^š]uo    
SFX V uo      enys            [^š]uo    
SFX V uo      enų             [^š]uo    
SFX V uo      enimis          [^š]uo    
SFX V uo      enims           [^š]uo    
SFX V uo      enis            [^š]uo    
SFX V uo      enyse           [^š]uo    
SFX V ys      ys              ys        
SFX V ys      ų               ys        
SFX V ys      ims             ys        
SFX V ys      imis            ys        
SFX V ys      is              ys        
SFX V ys      yse             ys        
SFX V uo      uns             šuo       
SFX V uo      uniui           šuo       
SFX V uo      unį             šuo       
SFX V uo      uniu            šuo       
SFX V uo      unimi           šuo       
SFX V uo      unyje           šuo       
SFX V uo      uny             šuo       
SFX V uo      unie            šuo       
SFX V uo      unys            šuo       
SFX V uo      unų             šuo       
SFX V uo      unimis          šuo       
SFX V uo      unis            šuo       
SFX V uo      unyse           šuo       
