prince/dictionaries/lt.dic
akmuo/KV
apskritis/VI
asmuo/VK
atitikmuo/VKN
dantis/KV
debesis/VK
deguonis/V
duomuo/V
klotis/VI
liemuo/V
lygmuo/V
matmuo/VK
mėnuo/VK
nosis/VI
omuo/V
piemuo/V
pilnatis/IV
rašmuo/KV
raumuo/KV
ruduo/KV
skaitmuo/V
skersmuo/KV
šuo/V
vagis/VI
vaidmuo/VK
vanduo/V
žūtis/VI
žvėris/VI
